de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Boxen & Kampfsport > Boxringelemente: Boxring-Planen; Boxring-Deckenaufhänger; Boxring-Eckenpolster & Kissen; Boxringnetze; Boxringstangen; Boxring-Seilhalter; Boxring-Seile & Seilabdeckungen; Boxring-Verkleidungen; Boxring-Treppen; Boxring-Spannschlossabdeckungen
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Boksz és harcművészetek > Bokszgyűrűalkatrészek: Boxring ponyvák; Bokszgyűrű mennyezeti akasztók; Boxring sarokpárnák és védők; Bokszgyűrűhálók; Bokszgyűrűoszlopok; Boxring kötéltávtartók; Boxring kötelek és kötélvédők; Boxring szoknyák; Boxring lépcsők; Boxring kötélfeszítő takarók
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Πυγμαχία & πολεμικές τέχνες > Εξαρτήματα ρινγκ πυγμαχίας: Καμβάδες ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Κρεμάστρες οροφής για ρινγκ; Μαξιλάρια γωνιών ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Δίχτυα ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Πόλοι ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Διαχωριστικά σχοινιών ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Σχοινιά και καλύμματα σχοινιών ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Περιμετρικά καλύμματα ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Σκαλοπάτια ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Καλύμματα εντατήρων ρινγκ πυγμαχίας
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Nyrkkeily ja vapaaottelu > Nyrkkeilykehän osat: Nyrkkeilykehän matot; Nyrkkeilykehän kattoripustimet; Nyrkkeilykehän kulmatyynyt ja -pehmusteet; Nyrkkeilykehän verkot; Nyrkkeilykehän paalut; Nyrkkeilykehän köysien erottimet; Nyrkkeilykehän köydet ja köysien suojat; Nyrkkeilykehän helmat; Nyrkkeilykehän portaat; Nyrkkeilykehän kulmasuojat
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Box a bojové sporty > Součásti boxerských ringů: Plachty na boxerský ring; Stropní závěsy pro boxerské ringy; Rohové chrániče a vycpávky pro boxerský ring; Sítě pro boxerský ring; Sloupky pro boxerský ring; Rozpěrky lan pro boxerský ring; Lana a kryty lan pro boxerský ring; Zástěry na boxerský ring; Schůdky k boxerskému ringu; Kryty napínáků pro boxerský ring
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Đấm bốc & Võ thuật > Phụ kiện võ đài môn đấm bốc: Bạt phủ sàn boxing; Móc treo trần võ đài đấm bốc; Đệm góc đài boxing; Lưới võ đài môn đấm bốc; Cọc võ đài môn đấm bốc; Dây đai chia khoảng cách dây đài boxing; Dây đài và bọc dây đài boxing; Váy quây sàn boxing; Bậc thang lên sàn boxing; Vỏ bọc khóa cáp sàn boxing
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Box a bojové umenia > Časti boxerského ringu: Plátna na boxerské ringy; Stropné vešiaky boxerského ringu; Chrániče a vankúše do rohov boxerských ringov; Siete boxerského ringu; Stĺpy boxerského ringu; Rozpery na laná boxerského ringu; Laná a kryty na laná do boxerského ringu; Plachty boxerského ringu; Schody boxerského ringu; Kryty napínacích skrutiek boxerského ringu
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Boksen en vechtsporten > Onderdelen voor boksringen: Ringdoeken voor boksen; Plafondhangers voor boksringen; Hoekbeschermers en -kussens voor boksringen; Netten voor boksringen; Palen voor boksringen; Touwafstandhouders voor boksringen; Touwen en touwhoezen voor boksringen; Ringrokken voor boksen; Trappen voor boksringen; Spannerhoezen voor boksringen
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Boksas ir kovos menai > Bokso ringų dalys: Bokso ringo drobės; Bokso ringų lubų pakabos; Bokso ringo kampų apsaugos ir paminkštinimai; Bokso ringų tinklai; Bokso ringų kampai; Bokso ringo virvių tarpikliai; Bokso ringo virvės ir virvių uždangalai; Bokso ringo uždangalai; Bokso ringo laipteliai; Bokso ringo įtempiklių apsaugos
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Boksing og kampsport > Deler til bokseringer: Bokseringmatter; Takhengere for bokseringer; Hjørneputer for bokseringer; Nett til bokseringer; Stenger til bokseringer; Avstandsstykker for bokseringstau; Tau og tautropper for bokseringer; Ringskjørt for bokseringer; Trapper for bokseringer; Strekkfiskbeskyttere for bokseringer
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > มวยและศิลปะการต่อสู้ > ชิ้นส่วนเวทีมวย: ผ้าใบปูพื้นเวทีมวย; ที่แขวนเพดานเวทีมวย; เบาะกันกระแทกมุมเวทีมวย; ตาข่ายชกมวย; เสาเวทีมวย; ตัวรั้งเชือกเวทีมวย; เชือกและปลอกหุ้มเชือกเวทีมวย; ผ้าคลุมขอบเวทีมวย; บันไดขึ้นเวทีมวย; ปลอกหุ้มมุมเวทีมวย
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Boxe e artes marciais > Peças para ringues de boxe: Telas de ringue de boxe; Ganchos de teto para ringues de boxe; Proteções e almofadas de canto de ringue de boxe; Redes para ringues de boxe; Postes para ringues de boxe; Espaçadores de cordas de ringue de boxe; Cordas e capas para cordas de ringue de boxe; Saias de ringue de boxe; Escadas de ringue de boxe; Capas para tensores de ringue de boxe
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Boks i sztuki walki > Części ringów bokserskich: Maty do ringu bokserskiego; Wieszaki sufitowe na ring bokserski; Poduszki i osłony narożnikowe do ringu bokserskiego; Siatki bokserskie; Tyczki do ringów bokserskich; Separatory lin ringu bokserskiego; Liny i osłony lin ringu bokserskiego; Osłony ringu bokserskiego; Schodki do ringu bokserskiego; Osłony narożników ringu bokserskiego
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Boks in borilne veščine > Deli za boksarski ring: Platna za boksarske ringe; Stropni obešalniki za boksarski ring; Zaščitne blazine in ščitniki za vogale boksarskih ringov; Mreže za boksarski ring; Drogovi za boksarski ring; Distančniki za vrvi za boksarske ringe; Vrvi in prevleke za vrvi za boksarske ringe; Viseče obrobe za boksarski ring; Stopnice za boksarski ring; Zaščitne prevleke za boksarske ringe
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Boksning og kampsport > Boksering – dele: Underlag til bokseringe; Boksering – loftsbøjler; Hjørnepolstring og -puder til bokseringe; Boksering – net; Boksering – stolper; Tovadskillere til bokseringe; Tove og tovværksovertræk til bokseringe; Skørter til bokseringe; Trapper til bokseringe; Turnbuckle-overtræk til bokseringe
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Boxe e arti marziali > Parti per ring pugilato: Tappeti per ring da boxe; Sacche da appendere al soffitto per ring di boxe; Imbottiture e cuscini angolari per ring da boxe; Reti da ring per boxe; Pali del ring di boxe; Distanziatori per corde da ring da boxe; Corde e copricorde per ring da boxe; Gonnelle per ring da boxe; Scalette per ring da boxe; Copritenditori per ring da boxe
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Boxeo y artes marciales > Piezas para rings de boxeo: Lonas para ring de boxeo; Colgadores de techo para rings de boxeo; Cojines y protectores de esquina para ring de boxeo; Redes de ring de boxeo; Postes de ring de boxeo; Separadores de cuerdas para ring de boxeo; Cuerdas y fundas para cuerdas de ring de boxeo; Faldones para ring de boxeo; Escaleras para ring de boxeo; Fundas para tensores de ring de boxeo
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Box și arte marțiale > Piese pentru ringul de box: Pânze pentru ringul de box; Elemente suspendate pentru ringul de box; Perne și colțare pentru ringul de box; Plase pentru ringul de box; Stâlpi pentru ringul de box; Distanțiere pentru corzile ringului de box; Corzi și huse de corzi pentru ringul de box; Șorțuri pentru ringul de box; Trepte pentru ringul de box; Huse pentru întinzătoarele ringului de box
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Boks ve Dövüş Sporları > Boks Ringi Parçaları: Boks ringi brandaları; Boks Ringi Tavan Askıları; Boks ringi köşe pedleri ve yastıkları; Boks Ringi Ağları; Boks Ringi Direkleri; Boks ringi halat ayırıcıları; Boks ringi halatları ve halat kılıfları; Boks ringi etekleri; Boks ringi merdivenleri; Boks ringi köşe gergisi kılıfları
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бокс и единоборства > Элементы боксерского ринга: Покрытия (канвас) для боксерского ринга; Потолочные подвесы для боксерского ринга; Угловые подушки для боксерского ринга; Сетки для боксерского ринга; Угловые столбы для боксерского ринга; Перемычки для канатов боксерского ринга; Канаты и чехлы на канаты для боксерского ринга; Юбки для боксерского ринга; Ступеньки для боксерского ринга; Чехлы на талрепы для боксерского ринга
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 拳击/武术 > 拳击台零部件: 拳击台帆布; 拳击台天花板吊架; 拳击台角垫; 拳击台网; 拳击台杆; 拳击台围绳隔离带; 拳击台围绳与护套; 拳击台围裙; 拳击台台阶; 拳击台角柱护套
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бокс и бойни изкуства > Части за боксов ринг: Платна за боксов ринг; Таванни окачвания за боксов ринг; Ъглови протектори и възглавници за боксов ринг; Мрежи за боксови рингове; Пилони за боксов ринг; Разделители за въжета за боксов ринг; Въжета и калъфи за въжета за боксов ринг; Поли за боксови рингове; Стъпала за боксови рингове; Калъфи за обтегачи за боксови рингове
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 권투/무술 > 권투 링 부품: 복싱 링 캔버스; 권투 링 천장 걸이; 복싱 링 코너 패드 및 쿠션; 권투 링 네트; 권투 링 기둥; 복싱 링 로프 스페이서; 복싱 링 로프 및 로프 커버; 복싱 링 스커트; 복싱 링 스텝; 복싱 링 턴버클 커버
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Boxing & Martial Arts > Boxing Ring Parts: Boxing Ring Canvases; Boxing Ring Ceiling Hangers; Boxing Ring Corner Pads & Cushions; Boxing Ring Nets; Boxing Ring Poles; Boxing Ring Rope Spacers; Boxing Ring Ropes & Rope Covers; Boxing Ring Skirts; Boxing Ring Steps; Boxing Ring Turnbuckle Covers
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 拳擊與武術 > 拳擊台配件: 拳擊擂台帆布; 拳擊台天花板吊架; 拳擊擂台角柱墊與防護墊; 拳擊台場繩; 拳擊台場桿; 拳擊擂台邊繩分隔帶; 拳擊擂台邊繩與保護套; 拳擊擂台裙邊; 拳擊擂台台階; 拳擊擂台邊角保護套
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Boxe e artes marciais > Peças do ringue de boxe: Lonas de ringue de boxe; Ganchos de teto para ringue de boxe; Almofadas e protetores de canto para ringue de boxe; Redes para ringue de boxe; Postes para ringue de boxe; Espaçadores de cordas de ringue de boxe; Cordas e capas de cordas para ringue de boxe; Saias de ringue de boxe; Escadas de ringue de boxe; Protetores de tensores de ringue de boxe
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Boxning och kampsporter > Delar till boxningsringar: Ringmattor för boxningsringar; Takhängare för boxningsring; Hörnskydd och kuddar för boxningsringar; Boxningsringnät; Boxningsringstoplar; Repavskiljare för boxningsringar; Ringrep och repöverdrag för boxningsringar; Ringkappor för boxningsringar; Trappor till boxningsringar; Vantskruvsskydd för boxningsringar
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Boxe et arts martiaux > Pièces de ring de boxe: Bâches de ring de boxe; Cintres de plafond pour ring de boxe; Coussins d'angle de ring de boxe; Filets pour ring de boxe; Poteaux de ring de boxe; Séparateurs de cordes de ring de boxe; Cordes et protège-cordes de ring de boxe; Jupes de ring de boxe; Escaliers de ring de boxe; Protections de ridoirs de ring de boxe
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Boks i borilačke vještine > Dijelovi boksačkog ringa: Platna za boksački ring; Stropne vješalice za boksačke ringove; Štitnici i jastučići za kutove za boksački ring; Mreže za boksačke ringove; Stupovi za boksački ring; Odstojnici za užad za boksački ring; Užad i navlake za užad za boksački ring; Platno za boksački ring; Stepenice za boksački ring; Navlake za stezače za boksački ring
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ボクシング・格闘技 > ボクシングリングパーツ: ボクシングリングキャンバス; ボクシングリング天井ハンガー; ボクシングリングコーナーパッド・クッション; ボクシングリングネット; ボクシングリングポール; ボクシングリングロープスペーサー; ボクシングリングロープ・ロープカバー; ボクシングリングスカート; ボクシングリングステップ; ボクシングリングターンバックルカバー